Nevada, session 83, SB302.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 248 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each sheriff may enter into a written agreement with a
federal agency to authorize employees of the federal agency who
hold positions for which the primary responsibility is the
investigation and enforcement of federal laws to enforce state or
local laws, or both, within the jurisdiction and authority of the
sheriff.
2. Any written agreement entered into pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Must, without limitation:
(1) Be limited to a term of not more than 2 years.
(2) Designate the state or local laws, or both, to be
enforced.
(3) Designate each position with the federal agency to
which the written agreement applies.
(4) Prescribe the grounds for revocation of the authority of
an employee of the federal agency under the agreement.
(b) Must not grant any authority to an employee of the federal
agency that is outside of the jurisdiction and authority of the
sheriff.
3. An employee of a federal agency who holds a position with
the federal agency that is designated pursuant to subparagraph (3)
of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 in a written agreement entered
into pursuant to subsection 1 must be certified by the Peace
Officers’ Standards and Training Commission not later than 6
months after the date on which:
(a) The written agreement became effective; or
-
*SB302*

– 3 –
(b) The person commences employment with the federal
agency, if the person commences employment after the date on
which the written agreement became effective.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Federal agency” means:
(1) The Bureau of Land Management;
(2) The United States Forest Service;
(3) The National Park Service;
(4) The United States Fish and Wildlife Service;
(5) The Bureau of Reclamation;
(6) The United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(7) The United States Army Corps of Engineers; and
(8) The Department of Veterans Affairs.
(b) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 289.010.
Sec. 2. Chapter 289 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An employee of a federal agency that has entered into an
agreement with a sheriff pursuant to section 1 of this act may
exercise the powers of a peace officer only when performing duties
for the purposes, and within the scope, of the written agreement.
2. As used in this section, “federal agency” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. NRS 289.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.550 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and
NRS 3.310, 4.353, 258.007 and 258.060, and section 1 of this act, a
person upon whom some or all of the powers of a peace officer are
conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360, inclusive, and
section 2 of this act must be certified by the Commission within 1
year after the date on which the person commences employment as a
peace officer unless the Commission, for good cause shown, grants
in writing an extension of time, which must not exceed 6 months, by
which the person must become certified. A person who fails to
become certified within the required time shall not exercise any of
the powers of a peace officer after the time for becoming certified
has expired.
2. The following persons are not required to be certified by the
Commission:
(a) The Chief Parole and Probation Officer;
(b) The Director of the Department of Corrections;
(c) The Director of the Department of Public Safety, the deputy
directors of the Department and the chiefs of the divisions of the
Department other than the Investigation Division and the Nevada
Highway Patrol;
-
*SB302*

– 4 –
(d) The Commissioner of Insurance and the chief deputy of the
Commissioner of Insurance;
(e) Railroad police officers; and
(f) California correctional officers.
H
-
*SB302*